Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,100
Compressed fuel, defined.

Compressed fuel means compressed natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas, liquefied natural gas, butane, and any other type of compressed gas or compressed liquid suitable for fueling a motor vehicle. Compressed fuel does not include motor vehicle fuel as defined in section 66-482 or diesel fuel as defined in section 66-482.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 39.